Kentucky statutes. TITLE IV Judicial Branch
CHAPTER 22A Court of Appeals

22A.010.
Numbers of judges — Districts.

The Court of Appeals shall consist of fourteen (14) judges, with two (2) judges from each of seven (7) Court of Appeals districts.

The districts of the Court of Appeals shall correspond in geographical dimensions to the districts of the Supreme Court, as defined in KRS Chapter 21A.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 70, § 2, effective March 23, 1976.

22A.020.
Jurisdiction — Appeal procedures.

Except as provided in Section 110 of the Constitution, an appeal may be taken as a matter of right to the Court of Appeals from any conviction, final judgment, order, or decree in any case in Circuit Court, including a family court division of Circuit Court, unless such conviction, final judgment, order, or decree was rendered on an appeal from a court inferior to Circuit Court.

The Court of Appeals has jurisdiction to review interlocutory orders of the Circuit Court in civil cases, but only as authorized by rules promulgated by the Supreme Court.

Notwithstanding any other provision in this section, there shall be no review by appeal or by writ of certiorari from that portion of a final judgment, order or decree of a Circuit Court dissolving a marriage.

An appeal may be taken to the Court of Appeals by the state in criminal cases from an adverse decision or ruling of the Circuit Court, but only under the following conditions:

Such appeal shall not suspend the proceedings in the case.

Such appeal shall be taken in the manner provided by the Rules of Criminal Procedure and the Rules of the Supreme Court, except that the record on appeal shall be transmitted by the clerk of the Circuit Court to the Attorney General; and if the Attorney General is satisfied that review by the Court of Appeals is important to the correct and uniform administration of the law, he may deliver the record to the clerk of the Court of Appeals within the time prescribed by the above-mentioned rules.

When an appeal is taken pursuant to this subsection, the Court of Appeals, if the record so warrants, may reverse the decision of the Circuit Court and order a new trial in any case in which a new trial would not constitute double jeopardy or otherwise violate any constitutional rights of the defendant.

Any party aggrieved by the judgment of the Circuit Court in a case appealed from a court inferior thereto may petition the Court of Appeals for a writ of certiorari.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 70, § 3, effective March 23, 1976; 2003, ch. 66, § 16, effective June 24, 2003.

22A.030.
Facilities.

The administrative director of the courts shall provide for such physical facilities as are available for the operation of the Court of Appeals, and may utilize the services of the Finance and Administration Cabinet in securing such facilities.

The Court of Appeals may use any public property of, or any property leased or rented to, the Commonwealth or any of its political subdivisions for the holding of court and for its ancillary functions upon proper agreement with the applicable authorities.

The Court of Appeals may use any federal courtroom or other facility for the holding of court and for its ancillary functions upon proper agreement with the applicable authorities.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 70, § 4, effective March 23, 1976.

22A.040.
Clerk — Appointment — Compensation — Oath — Bond — Assistants — Fee schedule — Seal — Annual audit.

The clerk of the Court of Appeals shall be appointed by the court to serve at its pleasure. The annual salary of the clerk shall be fixed by the Supreme Court not to exceed twenty-two thousand dollars ($22,000).

Before entering upon the duties of his office, the clerk shall take the oath of office prescribed by the Constitution.

The clerk shall perform such duties as the Court of Appeals may assign, and shall be bonded to the Commonwealth, for faithful performance of duty, in such manner and in an amount not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) as the Supreme Court shall determine.

The clerk may appoint assistants in the number and at the salaries fixed by the Supreme Court.

The Court of Appeals shall adopt a seal. The clerk shall be the keeper of the seal and shall use it upon such documents as the Court of Appeals may require.

A fee schedule for services rendered by the clerk shall be fixed by rule of the Supreme Court, except that charges to litigants for the reproduction of appellate records and briefs shall be fixed and administered by the clerk. All fees collected by the clerk shall be remitted to the State Treasury.

The Auditor of Public Accounts shall audit the financial accounts of the clerk at least once every year.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 70, § 5, effective March 23, 1976.

22A.050.
Enforcement of mandates.

The Court of Appeals may enforce its mandates by fine or imprisonment, or both.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 70, § 6, effective March 23, 1976.

22A.060.
Reversal or modification of judgment — Procedure for appellate review.

A judgment, order or decree of a lower court may be reversed, modified or set aside by the Court of Appeals for errors appearing in the record.

The method of bringing a judgment, order or decree of a lower court to the Court of Appeals for review shall be established by Supreme Court rule. The procedures for appellate review shall be established by the Rules of Civil Procedure, Rules of Criminal Procedure and other rules promulgated by the Supreme Court.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 70, § 7, effective March 23, 1976.

22A.070.
Direction of process.

The original or final process of the Court of Appeals may be directed to the sheriff of any county.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 70, § 8, effective March 23, 1976.